Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB216.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2705 of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended to read:Section 2705. Fees.--(a) For the purposes of funding the construction, maintenance and operation of storm water management facilities, systems and management plans authorized under this article, a township may assess reasonable and uniform fees based in whole or in part on the characteristics of the property benefited by the facilities, systems and management plans, except as provided in subsections (b.1) and (b.2). The fees assessed may not exceed the amount necessary to meet the minimum requirements of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act 12345678910111213141516171819 (62 Stat. 1155, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq.), and Federal or State laws governing the implementation of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, for the construction, maintenance and operation of storm water management facilities, systems and management plans, as specified in 40 CFR 122.26 (relating to storm water discharges (applicable to State NPDES programs, see § 123.25)). In establishing the fees, the township shall consider and provide appropriate exemptions or credits for properties which have installed and are maintaining storm water facilities that meet best management practices and are approved or inspected by the township.(b) Any fee levied by the township can be assessed in one of the following methods:(1) On all properties in the township.(2) On all properties benefited by a specific storm water project.(3) By establishing a storm water management district and assessing the fee on all property owners in the district.(b.1) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (a) or (b), a township or municipal authority responsible for regulation of storm water management or administration of storm water management infrastructure within the township may not assess on any agricultural property the total area of impervious surface of which does not exceed thirty percent of the property's total land area a fee that is greater than twice the median assessment fee imposed on all properties in the township.(2) Within sixty days of the effective date of this paragraph and no later than September 30 of each year thereafter, the owner or operator of agricultural property that qualifies for limitation in fee assessment under this subsection 20250SB0216PN0166 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 must file a written notice with the township or municipal authority that affirms the property's intended use will continue to be operated as agricultural use for the current and subsequent calendar year. An administrative fee may not be imposed on any notice filed under this paragraph.(3) No later than thirty days before the date in which the agricultural property no longer qualifies for the limitation in fee assessment provided in this subsection, the owner or operator of agricultural property must file a written notice with the township or municipal authority.(b.2) In addition to the limitation in assessment of fee prescribed in subsection (b.1), a township or municipal authority responsible for regulation of storm water management or administration of storm water management infrastructure within the township shall further reduce the fee to the amount levied under subsections (a) and (b) on any agricultural property for annual costs incurred by the owner or operator for construction, maintenance, operation and financing of conservation measures performed in furtherance or facilitation of a Total Maximum Daily Load that has been developed pursuant to 33 U.S.C. Ch. 26 (relating to water pollution prevention and control). An owner or operator of agricultural property claiming an additional reduction to the fee imposed under subsection (b.1) must, by September 30 of each calendar year provide sufficient written documentation of costs incurred or to be incurred for that year. Any additional reduction in fee that the owner or operator is otherwise entitled to receive under this section shall be applied to the fee to be levied for the subsequent calendar year. An administrative fee may not be imposed for claims for additional reduction in fee filed under 20250SB0216PN0166 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this subsection.(b.3) For purposes of subsections (b.1) and (b.2), the term "agricultural property" shall include all contiguous area of real property operated by a person as part of "agricultural use," as defined in section 2 of the act of December 19, 1974 (P.L.973, No.319), known as the "Pennsylvania Farmland and Forest Land Assessment Act of 1974," regardless of whether the area is comprised of more than one deeded tract.(c) Any fee collected for the purposes of storm water management may only be used for the purposes authorized by this article.(d) The assessments shall be filed with the township treasurer.(e) An ordinance shall specify whether payments are to be made by annual or more frequent installments.Section 2. This act shall supersede the authority and amount of fee that a township or municipal authority may impose on agricultural property after the effective date of this section. Section 3. All provisions of law are repealed to the extent they are inconsistent with this act.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0216PN0166 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021